Washington statutes.
RCW 19.188.040

Video game rating system—Video game retailers shall post signs—Location—Information.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Video game" means an object or device that stores recorded data or instructions, receives data or instructions generated by a person who uses it, and, by processing the data or instructions, creates an interactive game capable of being played, viewed, or experienced on or through a computer, gaming system, console, or other technology.

(b) "Video game retailer" means a person who sells or rents video games to the public.

(c) "Point of sale" means the location in the retail establishment at which a transaction occurs resulting in the sale or rental of a video game.

(2) Every video game retailer shall post signs providing information to consumers about the existence of a nationally recognized video game rating system, or notifying consumers that a rating system is available, to aid in the selection of a game if such a rating system is in existence.

(3) The signs shall be posted within the retail establishment in prominent areas near the video game displays and points of sale. The signs and lettering shall be clearly visible to consumers at these locations.

(4) A video game retailer shall make available to consumers, upon request, information that explains the video game rating system.

[ 2005 c 230 s 1.]